src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-sunsungkwe_gt-norm.yaml
#Past participle
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc: сунсум
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1: сусмум
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2: сусмын
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3: сусме
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1: сусмаме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2: [сусмын, сусмы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3: сусмыг
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1: [сусмув, сусӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2: [сусмын, сусмы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3: сусмыт

#Past participle, single object
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcSg: сусмылум
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcSg: сусмылын
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcSg: сусмытэ
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcSg: сусмыламе̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcSg: сусмылы̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcSg: сусмытэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcSg: [сусмылув, сусмылӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcSg: сусмылы̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcSg: сусманыл

#Past participle, dual object
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcDu: сусмагум
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcDu: сусмагын
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcDu: сусмаге
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcDu: [сусмагаме̄н, сусмагагме̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcDu: [сусмагы̄н, сусмагагы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcDu: [сусмагы̄г, сусмагагы̄г]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcDu: [сусмагув, сусмвгӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcDu: [сусмагы̄н, сусмагагы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcDu: [сусмагагыл, сусмагаганыл]

#Past participle, plural object
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcPl: [сусманум, сусмананум]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcPl: [сусман, сусма̄нын]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcPl: [сусма̄нэ, сусмана̄нэ]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcPl: [сусманаме̄н, сусмананме̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcPl: [сусманн, сусманы̄н, сусмананы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcPl: [сусманэ̄н, сусмананэ̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcPl: [сусманув, сусманӯв, сусмананув, сусмананӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcPl: [сусманы̄н, сусмананы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcPl: [сусма̄ныл, сусмана̄ныл]

#Gerund
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger: сунсым
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg1: сунсымам
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg2: сунсыман
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg3: сунсыма
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu1: сунсымаме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu2: сунсыман
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu3: суснсымаг
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl1: сунсымав
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl2: сунсыман
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl3: сунсымат

#Privative
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger: сустал
    
